Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202677-3606
Department; limit on credits; claiming credit; procedure; fraud or misrepresentation; disallowance of credit.

(1) The department may approve tax credits under the School Readiness Tax Credit Act each taxable year until the total amount of credits approved for the taxable year reaches seven million five hundred thousand dollars.

(2) A child care and education provider shall claim any tax credits granted under the act by attaching the tax credit certification received from the department under section 77-3604 to the child care and education provider's tax return. An eligible staff member shall claim any tax credits granted under the act by attaching the tax credit certification received from the department under section 77-3605 to the eligible staff member's tax return.

(3) If the department finds that a person has obtained a credit by fraud or misrepresentation, the credits shall be disallowed and the taxpayer's state income tax for such taxable year shall be increased by the amount necessary to recapture the credit.

(4) Credits granted to a taxpayer, but later disallowed, may be recovered by the department within three years from the end of the year in which the credit was claimed.

Laws 2016, LB889, § 6;

Laws 2023, LB754, § 19.